Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-10] Conflict between laws. If a
conflict between any provision of this chapter and any federal law or
regulation relating to metropolitan planning organizations arises, federal law
or regulation shall govern. [L 2015, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next